Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 2. Rights to Foreign Waters

Law reviews. —

For article, “A Critical Look at Wyoming Water Law,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 307 (1989).

§ 41-3-201.
Definition.

All that part and amount of the waters of an interstate stream which, unless prevented by artificial barrier, will enter the state of Wyoming from another state while flowing in a natural stream channel, and which have been, or may hereafter be, determined by final decree of the supreme court of the United States not to be available for diversion and application to beneficial use within the state of Wyoming, or other waters originating outside of the state of Wyoming, and which neither the state of Wyoming nor any Wyoming appropriator could divert and use as against another state or appropriators therein, the rights to which through purchase, exchange or negotiation are acquired by anyone for beneficial use in the state of Wyoming, and which are conveyed, imported or permitted to flow into the state of Wyoming through the channel of any natural stream, or otherwise, are, for the purposes of this act [§§

41-3-201

through

41-3-208

], hereby defined as “foreign water”.

History.

Laws 1945, ch. 129, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 71-501; W.S. 1957, § 41-11.

Cross references. —

As to adjudication of rights of water for use in adjoining state, see §

41-4-104

.

§ 41-3-202.
Right to acquire.

Anyone may lawfully acquire by purchase or through other negotiations entered into with the owner of a water right in another state or with such other state or with both such owner and state, the right to bring into Wyoming for beneficial use all or any portion of the stream flow of foreign water, as herein defined, arising without the boundaries of the state of Wyoming and flowing into this state.

History.

Laws 1945, ch. 129, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 71-502; W.S. 1957, § 41-12.

§ 41-3-203.
Transportation in interstate channels.

The owner of the right of beneficial use of any foreign water acquired for beneficial use within the state of Wyoming may transport the same in the natural channel of any interstate stream from the state boundary line to the point in the state of Wyoming where the owner of such water desires to divert and take same from said natural stream channel, and shall have the right to divert and take from said natural stream channel, the full quantity of the foreign water which the owner thereof shall have caused to be delivered into the channel of such natural stream at the state boundary line, less that quantity of foreign water only representing loss in the transportation thereof from the state boundary line to the point of diversion in the state of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1945, ch. 129, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 71-503; W.S. 1957, § 41-13.

§ 41-3-204.
Duty to supervise delivery; expense.

It is hereby made the duty of the Wyoming state engineer, water division superintendents, water commissioners and deputy water commissioners, to supervise the delivery of such foreign water from the state boundary line where it enters the state of Wyoming in a natural stream channel, to the point of diversion in Wyoming; any additional expense of this supervision shall be borne by the owners of such foreign water as decided by the water officials of the state of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1945, ch. 129, § 6; C.S. 1945, § 71-506; W.S. 1957, § 41-14.

§ 41-3-205.
Rights of owner; priority of claims; subject to appropriation and diversion.

The owner of foreign water is hereby declared to have the exclusive right of beneficial use of such foreign water either for immediate application to beneficial use or by impounding the same in a reservoir for future application to beneficial use, as against any claim or right to appropriate any water belonging to the state of Wyoming, and against the right of any Wyoming appropriator to divert water from said interstate stream for beneficial use in Wyoming. All foreign water conveyed or allowed to flow into the state of Wyoming is hereby declared not to be subject to appropriation in Wyoming and not to be subject to diversion under any Wyoming appropriation notwithstanding the same shall flow in the channel of any natural stream within this state and notwithstanding the same may be commingled with the waters in such stream channel owned by the state of Wyoming or by appropriators under the laws of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1945, ch. 129, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 71-504; W.S. 1957, § 41-15.

Editor's notes. —

At the direction of the legislative service office, the language in W.S.

41-3-205

has been corrected in the

Wyoming Statutes Annotated

, 2005 Edition, to accurately reflect the law enacted in 1945 under Senate Enrolled Act 49 (Laws 1945, ch. 129). Previously published editions had inadvertently omitted the word “not” before “to be subject to diversion.”

§ 41-3-206.
Rights of owner; recording of claim.

The owner of any foreign water conveyed or allowed to flow into the state of Wyoming from without the boundaries of this state shall file in the office of the secretary of the Wyoming state board of control, within the period of one (1) month before the first conveyance or flowage of such foreign water into the state of Wyoming, a certificate in writing, signed by the owner of such foreign water, specifying the former owner or owners of such foreign water, the amount thereof so acquired, the natural stream channel to be used in the state of Wyoming as a conduit for the delivery of such foreign water to the point of diversion in the state of Wyoming and also designating the point of diversion of such foreign water in the state of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1945, ch. 129, § 5; C.S. 1945, § 71-505; W.S. 1957, § 41-16.

§ 41-3-207.
Rights of owner; right to divert and use.

The owners of foreign water may divert and use in priority order, all available water in said stream channel to which such owner may be lawfully entitled under any Wyoming appropriation to the same extent and under the same conditions as if such owner had not acquired any such foreign water.

History.

Laws 1945, ch. 129, § 7; C.S. 1945, § 71-507; W.S. 1957, § 41-17.

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Disparity Between State Water Rights Records and Actual Water Use Patterns,” see V Land & Water L. Rev. 23 (1970).

§ 41-3-208.
Diverting from owner prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for anyone not the owner thereof to divert and take from the natural channel of any interstate stream designated by the certificate required in W.S.

41-3-206

flowing within the state of Wyoming, any foreign water or in any manner interfere with the ability of the owner of foreign water to transport the same in the natural stream channel in Wyoming to the point of diversion and to divert the same thereat. Any violation of this section shall be punishable pursuant to W.S.

41-3-616

.

History.

Laws 1945, ch. 129, § 8; C.S. 1945, § 71-508; W.S. 1957, § 41-18; Laws 2005, ch. 82, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added the last sentence.

§ 41-3-209.
Change of point of diversion; power to petition generally.

Any person, association or corporation having heretofore acquired a right from an adjoining state to the beneficial use of the water of any stream, entering the state of Wyoming and where the point of diversion of the appropriation is located in the adjoining state and the ditch irrigates land within the state of Wyoming, and who desires to change the point of diversion from said stream from within the adjoining state to a point within the state of Wyoming, shall petition therefor to the state board of control.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 116, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 71-509; W.S. 1957, § 41-19.

§ 41-3-210.
Change of point of diversion; contents of petition.

All petitions for such change of point of diversion shall be made to the state board of control setting forth the acreage in each legal subdivision of land irrigated, with the total acreage, together with a map, showing the location of the stream, the ditch, the old and new points of diversion, the new point of diversion in Wyoming to be tied to the nearest corner of the public land survey; the nature and extent of the irrigation works, their size, capacity, and length, and a certified copy of the proceedings had before the proper board, officer, or court, which has authority in the adjoining state to adjudicate water rights; amount of water adjudicated, the land for which the same was adjudicated; the date of priority, the date of adjudication, showing the existence of a valid water right, and that the same is in full force and effect.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 116, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 71-510; W.S. 1957, § 41-20; Laws 2005, ch. 15, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “petitions” for “petitioners” and “a map” for “maps in duplicate, one (1) of which shall be on tracing linen.”

§ 41-3-211.
Change of point of diversion; endorsement and recording of petition.

Upon receipt of the petition by the board of control, it shall be the duty of the president of said board to make an endorsement thereon of the date of its receipt, and to properly record receipt of the petition.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 116, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 71-511; W.S. 1957, § 41-21; Laws 2005, ch. 15, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “properly record receipt of the petition” for “make a record of same in a proper book kept for that purpose.”

§ 41-3-212.
Change of point of diversion; hearing.

It shall be the duty of the board of control at its next regular meeting following the receipt of such petition to examine same and ascertain if it sets forth all the facts required by W.S.

41-3-210

, and the validity of the water right granted by the adjoining state. Upon it being made to appear to the satisfaction of the board of control that the requirements of law and the regulations of the board have been complied with and that the petitioner is entitled to make the proposed changes, the said petition shall be referred to the division superintendent of the proper water division for a public hearing to be held not later than one hundred and twenty (120) days, following the date so referred. The said superintendent shall, by order, require all persons interested to appear on said certain day to show cause why the petition should not be granted. The said order shall be published for four (4) consecutive weeks in a newspaper having general circulation in the county where the proposed change of point of diversion is located; provided, that the consent of all owners of intervening diversions be secured, or that those not secured shall be notified by registered mail at least thirty (30) days prior to the hearing date. Any party who may claim injury on account of said proposed change of point of diversion shall have the right to appear before the superintendent at the public hearing as ordered, and present evidence in support of said claim. The evidence of such hearing shall be confined to the subjects enumerated in the notice for hearing. Upon completion of the taking of testimony in such hearing, it shall be the duty of the division superintendent to transmit same to the office of the board of control together with a written report setting forth the procedure followed and the results accomplished. At the next regular meeting, the board shall consider the evidence transmitted and enter a proper order either granting or denying the petition.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 116, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 71-512; W.S. 1957, § 41-22.

§ 41-3-213.
Change of point of diversion; rights of applicant upon approval; certificate of appropriation.

The approval of the petition shall grant to the applicant the same right in all respects as existed under the laws of the adjoining state as to land to be irrigated, amount of water, and date of priority, as fully as though the water right had originally been acquired from the state of Wyoming. No direct flow appropriation shall be recognized under this act [§§

41-3-209

through

41-3-215

] for an amount of water in excess of the statutory limit of one (1) cubic foot per second for each seventy (70) acres of land irrigated. The board of control shall issue a certificate of appropriation to applicants under this act, and the fee for issuing it shall not exceed fifty dollars ($50.00).

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 116, § 5; C.S. 1945, § 71-513; W.S. 1957, § 41-23; Laws 1993, ch. 123, § 1.

§ 41-3-214.
Change of point of diversion; fees and costs.

The applicant shall pay the statutory fee for a stenographer to take the testimony at each hearing, and provide for a stenographic record of the proceedings, and in addition the administrative costs of the hearing official and the necessary recording fee to record the order issued by the board, as hereinabove provided, in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the change of point of diversion is situated.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 116, § 7; C.S. 1945, § 71-515; W.S. 1957, § 41-24; Laws 1993, ch. 123, § 1.

Repealing clauses. —

Laws 1941, ch. 116, § 8, repealed Laws 1939, ch. 123.

§ 41-3-215.
Change of point of diversion; appeal from adverse decision.

Any applicant or person interested, feeling himself aggrieved by the decision of the board of control may appeal from said decision to the district court in the county in which said point of diversion is proposed to be located in the same manner and by the same procedure as set forth in W.S.

41-4-517

, or amendments thereto.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 116, § 6; C.S. 1945, § 71-514; W.S. 1957, § 41-25.

Cross references. —

As to judicial review of administrative action, see Rule 12, W.R.A.P.